Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-469
Military property of United States; loss, damage, destruction, or wrongful disposition.

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority:

(1) Sells or otherwise disposes of;

(2) Willfully or through neglect damages, destroys, or loses; or

(3) Willfully or through neglect suffers to be lost, damaged, destroyed, sold, or wrongfully disposed of, any military property of the United States or the State of Nebraska shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 69, p. 1578.